Illinois, session 104th, SB1029.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Records Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 160/1)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.4)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the State Records Act.8(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)